Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.520

"Funds" defined.

The "funds" of a converted savings bank, as the term is used in Title 32 RCW, shall mean deposits, sums credited to the liquidation account, capital stock, the principal balance of any outstanding capital notes, capital debentures, borrowings, undivided profits and income derived from the foregoing or the proceeds of the foregoing as listed in this section.

[ 1999 c 14 s 31; 1981 c 85 s 103.]